Missouri, session 2026, SB1512.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 85, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
seventy-two new sections, to be known as sections 85.1000,
85.1005, 85.1010, 85.1015, 85.1020, 85.1025, 85.1030, 85.1035,
85.1040, 85.1045, 85.1050, 85.1055, 85.1060, 85.1065, 85.1070,
85.1075, 85.1080, 85.1085, 85.1090, 85.1100, 85.1105, 85.1110,
85.1115, 85.1120, 85.1125, 85.1130, 85.1135, 85.1140, 85.1145,
85.1150, 85.1155, 85.1160, 85.1165, 85.1170, 85.1175, 85.1180,
85.1185, 85.1190, 85.1195, 85.1200, 85.1205, 85.1210, 85.1215,
85.1220, 85.1225, 85.1230, 85.1235, 85.1240, 85.1245, 85.1250,
85.1255, 85.1260, 85.1265, 85.1270, 85.1275, 85.1280, 85.1285,
85.1290, 85.1300, 85.1305, 85.1310, 85.1340, 85.1355, 85.1360,
85.1365, 85.1370, 85.1375, 85.1380, 85.1385, 85.1390, 85.1395,
and 85.1400, to read as follows:
85.1000. 1. A "police protection district" is a
political subdivision which is organized and empowered to
supply protection by any available means to persons and
property against injuries and damage from crimes and from
hazards which do or may cause harm or injury to persons and
property, and which is also empowered to render first aid
for the purpose of saving lives, and to give assistance in

SB 1512 2
the event of an accident or emergency of any kind. The
district shall consist of contiguous tracts or parcels of
property containing all or parts of one county, and may
include, in whole but not in part within its boundaries, or
may be contiguous, in whole but not in part, with, any city,
town, or village.
2. The word "board" as used in sections 85.1000 to
85.1400 shall mean the board of directors of a police
protection district.
3. Except as otherwise provided in sections 85.1000 to
85.1400, all elections herein provided for shall be held and
conducted and the returns thereof made, examined, and cast
up in the same manner and in all respects as in elections
for municipal, state, and county officers.
85.1005. 1. No person holding any lucrative office or
employment under this state, or any political subdivision
thereof as defined in section 70.120, shall hold the office
of police protection district director under sections
85.1000 to 85.1400. When any police protection district
director accepts any office or employment under this state
or any political subdivision thereof, his or her office
shall thereby be vacated and he or she shall thereafter
perform no duty and receive no salary or expenses as police
protection district director.
2. This section shall not apply to an ex-officio
director, members of the organized militia, of the reserve
corps, and notaries public.
3. For the purposes of this section, the term
"lucrative office or employment" does not include receiving
retirement benefits, compensation for expenses, or a stipend
or per diem, in an amount not to exceed the standard state
per diem allowance for each day of service, for service

SB 1512 3
rendered to a police protection district, the state, or any
political subdivision thereof.
85.1010. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
85.1005, no employee of any police protection district shall
serve as a member of any police district board while such
person is employed by any police protection district.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, individual board members shall not be eligible for
employment by the board within twelve months of termination
of service as a member of the board unless such employment
is on a volunteer basis or without compensation.
85.1015. The voters residing in a proposed district,
may, as provided in sections 85.1000 to 85.1400, establish
police protection districts.
85.1020. The organization of a district shall be
initiated by a petition filed in the office of the clerk of
the county vested with jurisdiction in any county in which
all or part of the real property in the proposed district is
situated. The petition shall be signed by one hundred
voters or more of the district.
85.1025. The petition shall set forth:
(1) The name of the proposed district consisting of a
chosen name preceding the words "police protection district";
(2) An estimate of the number of inhabitants and of
the assessed valuation of the taxable tangible property of
the district, and of the yield from the intangible personal
property located in the district;
(3) The estimated cost of the proposed improvements;
(4) A general description of the boundaries of the
district or the territory to be included therein, and the
boundaries of three wards in which the district shall be
subdivided, with such certainty as to enable a property

SB 1512 4
owner to determine whether or not his property is within the
district, and a plat of the proposed district;
(5) The wards shall be compact and contiguous and
contain equal populations as nearly as possible, and shall
be reapportioned, by the board of directors, within one
hundred eighty days after each decennial census is reported
to the President of the United States;
(6) Such other data and information as may be useful
to the voters in determining the necessity for the
organization of the district; and
(7) A prayer for the organization of the district.
85.1030. No petition with the requisite signatures
shall be declared null and void on account of alleged
defects, but the county clerk may at any time permit the
petition to be amended to conform with the facts, by
correcting any errors in the description of the territory,
or in any other particular, except that the boundaries of
the district may not be enlarged by taking in additional
territory, without notice to the owners of the property thus
affected, which notice may be made by publication or service
of such pleadings and orders on the owners so affected.
Similar petitions or duplicate copies of the same petition
for the organization of the same district, revising the
boundaries of the proposed district, or recommending another
chosen name for the district, may be filed at any time
before a hearing is had on the petition, and shall, together
with the first petition, be regarded as one petition, and
shall be considered by the county clerk the same as though
filed with the first petition placed on file.
85.1035. There shall be filed with the petition, or
petitions, a filing fee in the amount of one hundred dollars
to cover the payment of processing costs.

SB 1512 5
85.1040. Immediately after the filing of such petition
or any amended petition changing the boundaries, the county
clerk wherein such petition is filed shall, by order, fix a
time and place not less than thirty days nor more than sixty
days after the petition is filed for a hearing thereon, and
thereupon the county clerk shall cause notice by publication
to be made of the filing of the petition and the pendency of
the action and of the time and place of the hearing
thereon. The county clerk shall also forthwith cause a copy
of the notice to be mailed by United States registered mail
to the governing body of each municipality having territory
within the proposed boundaries of the proposed district, and
to the county commission of each county in which the
proposed district lies.
85.1045. The county clerk in and for the county in
which the petition for the organization of a district has
been filed shall thereafter for all purposes of sections
85.1000 to 85.1400, except as otherwise provided, maintain
and have original and exclusive jurisdiction over all
matters connected with or affected by said district. No
county clerk wherein such petition is filed shall be
disqualified to perform any duty imposed by sections 85.1000
to 85.1400 by reason of ownership of property within the
proposed district.
85.1050. Upon the hearing if it shall appear that a
petition for the organization of a district has been signed
and presented pursuant to the provisions of sections 85.1000
to 85.1400, and that the allegations of the petition are
true, the county clerk shall, by order duly entered of
record, adjudicate all questions of jurisdiction, declare
the district organized, define the boundaries thereof, and
give it a corporate name by which in all proceedings it

SB 1512 6
shall thereafter be known, and thereupon the district,
subject to the election herein provided, shall be a
political subdivision of the state of Missouri and a body
corporate with all the powers of like or similar
corporations.
85.1055. Upon the hearing if the county clerk finds
that the petition has not been signed, filed, and presented
pursuant to the provisions of sections 85.1000 to 85.1400,
it shall dismiss the proceedings and adjudge the costs
against the sponsors of the petition, or petitions, in such
proportion as it deems just and equitable. Nothing herein
shall be construed to prevent the filing of a subsequent
petition, or petitions, for similar improvements or for a
similar district, and the right so to renew such proceeding
is hereby expressly granted and authorized.
85.1060. 1. The decree of incorporation shall not
become final and conclusive until it has been submitted to
an election of the voters residing within the boundaries
described in such decree, and until it has been assented to
by a majority vote of the voters of the district voting on
the question. The decree shall also provide for the holding
of the election to vote on the proposition of incorporating
the district, and to elect three persons to act as the
elected members of the first board of directors, and shall
fix the date for holding the election on the first general
municipal election date to vote on a tax pursuant to section
85.1150 following entry of the decree in which notice of
election may be issued sufficiently in advance of the
election according to law.
2. The question shall be submitted in substantially
the following form:

SB 1512 7
Shall there be incorporated a police protection
district?
□ YES □ NO
3. The proposition of electing the first board of
directors or the election of subsequent directors may be
submitted on a separate ballot or on the same ballot which
contains any other proposition of the police protection
district. The ballot to be used for the election of a
director or directors shall be substantially in the
following form:
OFFICIAL BALLOT
Instruction to voters:
Place a cross (X) mark in the square opposite the
name of the candidate or candidates you favor.
(Here state the number of directors to be elected
and their term of office.)
ELECTION
(Here insert name of district) Police Protection
District
(Here insert date of election)
FOR BOARD OF DIRECTORS
WARD (#)
□ ____________ (Name of candidate)
□ ____________ (Name of candidate)
□ ____________ (Name of candidate)

SB 1512 8
4. If a majority of the voters voting on the
proposition or propositions voted in favor of the
proposition to incorporate the district, then the county
clerk shall enter its further order declaring the decree of
incorporation to be final and conclusive. In the event,
however, that the county clerk finds that a majority of the
voters voting thereon voted against the proposition to
incorporate the district, then the county clerk shall enter
its further order declaring the decree of incorporation to
be void and of no effect. If the county clerk enters an
order declaring the decree of incorporation to be final and
conclusive, it shall at the same time designate the first
board of directors of the district who have been elected by
the voters voting thereon. The person elected from ward 1
shall hold office for a term of one year, the person elected
from ward 2 shall hold office for a term of two years, and
the person elected from ward 3 shall hold office for a term
of three years from the date of the election of the first
board of directors and until their successors are duly
elected and qualified. Thereafter, the elected members of
the board shall be elected to serve terms of three years and
until their successors are duly elected and qualified. The
county clerk shall at the same time enter an order of record
declaring the result of the election on the proposition, if
any, to incur bonded indebtedness.
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 1 to
4 of this section to the contrary, the mayor of each
municipality and chairperson of each village included within
the police protection district shall be an ex-officio member
of the board of directors so long as he or she shall hold
the office of mayor or chairperson, with all of the same
rights, privileges, and duties as an elected director.

SB 1512 9
85.1065. A person, to be qualified to serve as an
elected director, shall be a resident and voter of the
district and the ward from which he or she shall represent
for at least one year before the election or appointment and
be over the age of twenty-four years. In the event the
person is no longer a resident of the district or the ward
from which he or she was elected, the person's office shall
be vacated, and the vacancy shall be filled as provided in
section 85.1110. Nominations and declarations of candidacy
shall be filed at the headquarters of the police protection
district by paying a filing fee equal to the amount of a
candidate for county office as set forth under section
115.357, and filing a statement under oath that such person
possesses the required qualifications. Thereafter, such
candidate shall have the candidate's name placed on the
ballot as a candidate for director. The names of candidates
for each office shall be listed in the order in which they
are filed; provided, however, that on the first day for
filing declaration of candidacies, a random drawing shall be
held.
85.1070. If a final order be entered establishing the
district, such order shall be deemed final and conclusive,
and no appeal or writ of error shall lie therefrom, and the
entry of such order shall finally and conclusively establish
the regular organization of said district against all
persons except the state of Missouri, in an action in the
nature of a writ of quo warranto, commenced by the attorney
general within thirty days after said decree declaring such
district finally organized as herein provided and not
otherwise. The organization of such district shall not be
directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or
proceeding except as herein expressly authorized.

SB 1512 10
85.1075. Within thirty days after the final order of
the county in which the district has been declared a public
corporation, the county clerk of that county shall transmit
to the recorder of deeds in each county in which the
district is located copies of the findings and decrees of
the county clerk incorporating the district. The same shall
be filed in the same manner as articles of incorporation are
required to be filed under the general laws concerning
corporations, and each recorder and clerk shall receive a
fee of one dollar for filing and preserving the same.
85.1080. Whenever a district has been declared duly
and finally organized, the members of the board shall
thereafter qualify within fifteen days by filing with the
county clerk their oaths of office, which shall be in the
form prescribed by the constitution, and such board members
shall also file with the county clerk corporate surety bonds
to be furnished at the expense of the district in an amount
not to exceed one thousand dollars each, the form and amount
thereof to be fixed and approved by the county having
jurisdiction, and said bonds to be conditioned for the
faithful performance of their duties as directors. For the
first board of directors, the county shall advance the cost
of the bonds until reimbursed by the district upon receipt
of tax funds.
85.1085. 1. All members of the board of directors of
a police protection district first elected or first serving
in an ex-officio capacity shall attend and complete an
educational seminar or conference or other suitable training
on the role and duties of a board member of a police
protection district. The training required under this
section shall be conducted by an entity approved by the
director of the department of public safety. The director

SB 1512 11
of the department of public safety shall determine the
content of the training to fulfill the requirements of this
section. Such training shall include, at a minimum:
(1) Information relating to the roles and duties of a
police protection district director;
(2) A review of all state statutes and regulations
relevant to police protection districts;
(3) State ethics laws;
(4) State sunshine laws, chapter 610;
(5) Financial and fiduciary responsibility;
(6) State laws relating to the setting of tax rates;
and
(7) State laws relating to revenue limitations.
2. If any police protection district board member
fails to attend a training session within twelve months
after taking office, the board member shall not be
compensated for attendance at meetings thereafter until the
board member has completed such training session.
85.1090. After taking their oaths and filing their
bonds, the board shall choose one of its members as chair of
the board and president of the district, and shall elect a
secretary and a treasurer of the board and of the district,
who may or may not be members of the board. The secretary
and the treasurer may be one person. Such board shall adopt
a seal, and the secretary shall keep in a well-bound book a
record of all its proceedings, minutes of all meetings,
certificates, contracts, bonds given by employees, and a
record of corporate acts, which shall be open to inspection
of all owners of property in the district, as well as to all
other interested parties.
85.1100. The treasurer shall keep strict and accurate
accounts of all money received by and disbursed for and on

SB 1512 12
behalf of the district in permanent records. He or she
shall file with the clerk of the county, at the expense of
the district, a corporate fidelity bond in an amount to be
determined by the board for not less than five thousand
dollars, conditioned on the faithful performance of the
duties of his or her office. He or she shall file in the
office of the county clerk of each county in which all or
part of the district lies a detailed financial statement for
the preceding fiscal year of the district on behalf of the
board, on or before April first of the following year.
85.1105. Each member of the board may receive an
attendance fee not to exceed one hundred dollars for
attending each regularly called board meeting, or special
meeting, but shall not be paid for attending more than two
in any calendar month, except that in counties with a
charter form of government, he or she shall not be paid for
attending more than four in any calendar month. However, no
board member shall be paid more than one attendance fee if
such member attends more than one board meeting in a
calendar week. In addition, the chairman of the board of
directors may receive fifty dollars for attending each
regularly or specially called board meeting, but shall not
be paid the additional fee for attending more than two
meetings in any calendar month. Each member of the board
shall be reimbursed for his or her actual expenditures in
the performance of his or her duties on behalf of the
district. The secretary and the treasurer, if members of
the board of directors, may each receive such additional
compensation for the performance of their respective duties
as secretary and treasurer as the board shall deem
reasonable and necessary, not to exceed one thousand dollars
per year. The court having jurisdiction over the district

SB 1512 13
shall have power to remove directors for good cause shown as
set forth in section 106.220 upon a petition, notice, and
hearing.
85.1110. 1. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 3 of this section, the board shall meet
regularly, not less than once each month, at a time and at
some building in the district to be designated by the
board. Notice of the time and place of future regular
meetings shall be posted continuously at the police station
or police stations of the district. Additional meetings may
be held, when the needs of the district so require, at a
place regular meetings are held, and notice of the time and
place shall be given to each member of the board. Meetings
of the board shall be held and conducted in the manner
required by the provisions of chapter 610. All minutes of
meetings of the board and all other records of the police
protection district shall be available for public inspection
at the main police station within the district by
appointment with the secretary of the board within one week
after a written request is made between the hours of 8:00
a.m. and 5:00 p.m. every day except Sunday. A majority of
the members of the board shall constitute a quorum at any
meeting and no business shall be transacted unless a quorum
is present. The board, acting as a board, shall exercise
all powers of the board, without delegation thereof to any
other governmental or other body or entity or association,
and without delegation thereof to less than a quorum of the
board. Agents, employees, engineers, auditors, attorneys,
police officers, and any other member of the staff of the
district may be employed or discharged only by a board which
includes at least two directors; but any board of directors
may suspend from duty any such person or staff member who

SB 1512 14
willfully and deliberately neglects or refuses to perform
his or her regular functions. Any member of the board of
directors who fails to attend four meetings in succession,
without being excused by the remaining members of the board,
shall result in a forfeiture of office. The district shall
maintain a website. Notices of meetings, minutes, proposed
and adopted ordinances, and monthly and annual financial
reports shall be published on the district's website.
2. Any vacancy on the board shall be filled by the
remaining members of the board. The appointee or appointees
shall act until the next general municipal election
following said vacancy in which notice of election may be
given sufficiently in advance and in accordance with law to
serve the remainder of the unexpired term.
3. Notwithstanding any provision of sections 610.015
and 610.020 to the contrary, when Missouri is activated for
deployment by the federal emergency management agency, state
emergency management agency, or statewide mutual aid, a
quorum of the board of directors of the affiliated police
protection district may meet in person, via telephone,
facsimile, internet, or any other voice or electronic means,
without public notice, in order to authorize by roll call
vote the disbursement of funds necessary for the deployment.
4. In the event action is necessary under subsection 3
of this section, the board of directors of the affiliated
police protection district shall keep minutes of the
emergency meeting and disclose during the next regularly
scheduled meeting of the board that the emergency meeting
was held, the action that precipitated calling the emergency
meeting without notice, and that the minutes of the
emergency meeting are available as a public record of the
board.

SB 1512 15
85.1115. On the first Tuesday in April after the
expiration of at least one full calendar year from the date
of the election of the elected members of the first board of
directors, and on the first Tuesday in April every one year
thereafter, an election for elected members for members of
the board of directors shall be held in the district.
Nominations shall be filed at the headquarters of the police
protection district in which a majority of the district is
located by paying a filing fee equal to the amount of a
candidate for county office as set forth under section
115.357 and filing a statement under oath that the candidate
possesses the required qualifications. The candidate
receiving the most votes shall be elected. Any new member
of the board shall qualify in the same manner as the members
of the first board qualify.
85.1120. For the purpose of providing police
protection to the persons and property within the district,
the district and, on its behalf, the board shall have the
following powers, authority, and privileges:
(1) To have perpetual existence;
(2) To have and use a corporate seal;
(3) To sue and be sued, and be a party to suits,
actions, and proceedings;
(4) To enter into contracts, franchises, and
agreements with any person, partnership, association, or
corporation, public or private, affecting the affairs of the
district, including contracts with any municipality,
district, or state, or the United States of America, and any
of their agencies, political subdivisions, or
instrumentalities, for the planning, development,
construction, acquisition, or operation of any public
improvement or facility, or for a common service relating to

SB 1512 16
the control or prevention of crime, including the
installation, operation, and maintenance of police alarm
systems; provided, that a notice shall be published for bids
on all construction or purchase contracts for work or
material or both, outside the authority contained in
subdivision (9) of this section, involving an expense of ten
thousand dollars or more;
(5) Upon approval of the voters as herein provided, to
borrow money and incur indebtedness and evidence the same by
certificates, notes, or debentures, and to issue bonds, in
accordance with the provisions of sections 85.1000 to
85.1265;
(6) To acquire, construct, purchase, maintain, dispose
of, and encumber real and personal property, police
stations, police protection and police-fighting apparatus
and auxiliary equipment therefor, and any interest therein,
including leases and easements;
(7) To refund any bonded indebtedness of the district
without an election. The terms and conditions of refunding
bonds shall be substantially the same as those of the
original issue of bonds, and the board shall provide for the
payment of interest, not to exceed the legal rate, and the
principal of such refunding bonds in the same manner as is
provided for the payment of interest and principal of bonds
refunded;
(8) To have the management, control, and supervision
of all the business and affairs of the district, and the
construction, installation, operation, and maintenance of
district improvements therein;
(9) To hire and retain agents, employees, engineers,
and attorneys, including part-time or volunteer commissioned
officers or police;

SB 1512 17
(10) To have and exercise the power of eminent domain
and in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of
private property for public use to take any property within
the district necessary to exercise the powers herein granted;
(11) To receive and accept by bequest, gift, or
donation any kind of property. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, any property received by
the police protection district as a gift or any property
purchased by the police protection district at a price below
the actual market value of the property may be returned to
the donor or resold to the seller if such property is not
used for the specific purpose for which it was acquired;
(12) To adopt and amend bylaws, administrative
ordinances, and any other rules and regulations not in
conflict with the constitution and laws of this state,
necessary for the carrying on of the business, objects, and
affairs of the board and of the district, and refer to the
proper authorities for prosecution any infraction thereof
detrimental to the district. Any person violating any such
ordinance is hereby declared to be guilty of a misdemeanor,
and upon conviction thereof shall be punished as is provided
by law therefor. The prosecuting attorney for the county in
which the violation occurs shall prosecute such violations
in the city of that county. The legal officer or attorney
for the police district may be appointed by the prosecuting
attorney as special assistant prosecuting attorney for the
prosecution of any such violation. The enactments of the
police district in delegating administrative authority to
officials of the district may provide standards of action
for the administrative officials, which standards are
declared as industrial codes adopted by nationally organized
and recognized trade bodies. The board shall have the power

SB 1512 18
to adopt an ordinance, rule, or regulation allowing the
district to charge individuals who reside outside of the
district, but who receive emergency services within the
boundaries of the district, for the actual and reasonable
cost of such services. However, such actual and reasonable
costs shall not exceed one hundred dollars for responding to
each police call or alarm and two hundred fifty dollars for
each hour or a proportional sum for each quarter hour spent
in combating a crime or emergency;
(13) To pay all county costs and expenses connected
with the first election or any subsequent election in the
district;
(14) To have and exercise all rights and powers
necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific
powers granted herein. Such specific powers shall not be
considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or
appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of sections
85.1000 to 85.1400;
100 (15) To provide for health, accident, disability, and
101 pension benefits for the salaried members of its organized
102 police department of the district and such other benefits
103 for their spouses and eligible unemancipated children,
104 through either or both a contributory or noncontributory
105 plan. For purposes of this section, "eligible unemancipated
106 child" means a natural or adopted child of an insured, or a
107 stepchild of an insured who is domiciled with the insured,
108 who is less than twenty-three years of age, who is not
109 married, not employed on a full-time basis, not maintaining
110 a separate residence except for full-time students in an
111 accredited school or institution of higher learning, and who
112 is dependent on parents or guardians for at least fifty
113 percent of his or her support. The type and amount of such

SB 1512 19
114 benefits shall be determined by the board of directors of
115 the police protection district within the level of available
116 revenues of the pension program and other available revenues
117 of the district. If an employee contributory plan is
118 adopted, then at least one voting member of the board of
119 trustees shall be a member of the police district elected by
120 the contributing members, which shall not be the same as the
121 board of directors;
122 (16) To contract with any municipality that is
123 contiguous to a police protection district for the police
124 protection district to provide police protection to the
125 municipality for a fee as hereinafter provided;
126 (17) To provide for life insurance, accident,
127 sickness, health, disability, annuity, length of service,
128 pension, retirement, and other employee-type fringe
129 benefits, subject to the provisions of section 70.615, for
130 the volunteer members of any organized police department of
131 the district and such other benefits for their spouses and
132 eligible unemancipated children, through either a
133 contributory or noncontributory plan, or both. For purposes
134 of this section, "eligible unemancipated child" means a
135 natural or adopted child of an insured, or a stepchild of an
136 insured who is domiciled with the insured, who is less than
137 twenty-three years of age, who is not married, not employed
138 on a full-time basis, not maintaining a separate residence
139 except for full-time students in an accredited school or
140 institution of higher learning, and who is dependent on
141 parents or guardians for at least fifty percent of his or
142 her support. The type and amount of such benefits shall be
143 determined by the board of directors of the police
144 protection district within available revenues of the
145 district, including the pension program of the district.

SB 1512 20
146 The provision and receipt of such benefits shall not make
147 the recipient an employee of the district. Directors who
148 are also volunteer members may receive such benefits while
149 serving as a director of the district;
150 (18) To contract for services with any rural,
151 volunteer, or subscription police department or
152 organization, or volunteer police protection association, as
153 defined in section 85.1195, for the purpose of providing the
154 benefits described in subdivision (17) of this section.
85.1125. The amount to be paid annually by the
municipality to the police district pursuant to subdivision
(16) of section 85.1120 shall be the annual assessed value
of all property subject to tax in the municipality
determined from the tax assessment ledgers, and including
public utilities and intangible property within such area,
multiplied by the annual tax rate as certified by the police
protection district to the municipality, but not including
any portion of the tax rate of service provided by the
district, per one hundred dollars of assessed value in such
area. The tax rate so computed shall include any tax on
bonded indebtedness incurred by the district prior to
entering into such contract, but shall not include any of
the tax rate for bonded indebtedness incurred during the
term that the contract is in force.
85.1130. Notwithstanding any provision in this section
to the contrary, a police protection district may enter into
a contract with a county, city, town, or village to assist
in police protection services.
85.1135. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, any police protection district may contract
with any municipality or village that does not operate its
own police department to provide police protection services

SB 1512 21
for a fee to any area of the municipality or village that
does not belong to the police protection district. In such
event, the municipality and the police protection district
shall, by ordinance duly enacted by the governing board of
each, agree upon the terms by which such police protection
shall be furnished. The agreement may provide for the
payment of a stated sum per year upon any method of
compensation for such police protection that is agreed upon
by the police district and the municipality entering into
such contract; provided that any contract for a period
longer than five years shall have no binding force until
ratified by a majority of the voters in the police district
and the municipality entering into such a contract. The
mayor of any municipality and chair of any village entering
into such contract, shall serve, ex-officio, as a member of
the board of directors.
85.1140. For the purpose of providing revenue for such
districts, the board shall have the power and authority to
order the levy and collection of ad valorem taxes on and
against all taxable tangible property within the district,
and to make timely demand and to sue for and collect any and
all other taxes, contributions, or allocations to which the
district may be entitled.
85.1145. To levy and collect taxes as herein provided,
the board shall in each year determine the amount of money
necessary to be raised by taxation, and shall fix a rate of
levy which, when levied upon every dollar of the taxable
tangible property within the district as shown by the last
completed assessment, and with other revenues, will raise
the amount required by the district annually to supply funds
for paying the expenses of organization and operation and
the costs of acquiring, supplying, and maintaining the

SB 1512 22
property, works, and equipment of the district, and maintain
the necessary personnel, which rate of levy shall not exceed
thirty cents on the one hundred dollars valuation; may fix
an additional rate, not to exceed ten cents on the hundred
dollars valuation, the revenues from which shall be
deposited in a special fund and used only for the pension
program of the district, by submitting the following
question to the voters:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Police
Protection District be authorized to increase the
annual tax rate from ______ cents to ______ cents
per one hundred dollars valuation, the revenues
from which shall be deposited in a special fund
and used only for the pension program of the
district?
Provided, that if the question fails to receive a majority
of the votes cast, it shall not be resubmitted to the voters
within one year after the election; except, that any
district may impose a tax not to exceed ten cents on the one
hundred dollars valuation, in addition to the rate which the
board may levy under this section, by submitting the
following question to the voters at any election in such
district at which a member of the board of directors is to
be elected:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Police
Protection District be authorized to increase
the annual tax rate from ______ cents to ______
cents on the hundred dollars assessed
valuation?

SB 1512 23
In addition thereto, to fix a rate of levy which will enable
it to promptly pay in full when due all interest on and
principal of bonds and other obligations of the district,
and to pay any indebtedness authorized by a vote of the
people as provided in sections 85.1000 to 85.1400; and in
the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies in the bonded
or contractual indebtedness, an additional levy may be made
as provided in section 85.1175.
85.1150. 1. The board of directors of any police
protection district may levy, if a majority of the voters of
the district voting thereon approve, in addition to all
other taxes heretofore approved, an additional tax of not
more than twenty-five cents per one hundred dollars of
assessed valuation to be used for the support of the
district. The proposition to levy the tax authorized by
this subsection may be submitted by the board of directors
at the first annual election of the members of the board. A
separate ballot containing the question shall read as
follows:
Shall the board of directors of the ______
Police Protection District be authorized to levy
an additional tax of not more than twenty-five
cents on the one hundred dollars assessed
valuation to provide funds for the support of
the district?
□ FOR THE PROPOSITION
□ AGAINST THE PROPOSITION
(Place an X in the square opposite the one for
which you wish to vote.)

SB 1512 24
If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon
be in favor of the question, the board of directors shall
accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of
this subsection, but if a majority of the voters casting
votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by
this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain
in effect.
2. The board of directors of any police protection
district may levy, if a majority of the voters of the
district voting thereon approve, in addition to all other
taxes heretofore approved, an additional tax of not more
than ten cents per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation
to be used for the support of the district. However, if the
majority of the voters of the district approved the tax
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, the board of
directors of any police protection district may levy an
additional tax of not more than twenty-five cents per one
hundred dollars of assessed valuation to be used for the
support of the district. The proposition to levy the tax
authorized by this subsection may be submitted by the board
of directors at the next annual election of the members of
the board or at any regular municipal or school election
conducted by the county clerk or board of election
commissioners in such district or at a special election
called for the purpose, or upon petition of five hundred
registered voters of the district. A separate ballot
containing the question shall read as follows:
Shall the board of directors of the ______
Police Protection District be authorized to
levy an additional tax of not more than ten
cents on the one hundred dollars assessed

SB 1512 25
valuation to provide funds for the support of
the district?
□ FOR THE PROPOSITION
□ AGAINST THE PROPOSITION
(Place an X in the square opposite the one for
which you wish to vote.)
If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon
be in favor of the question, the board of directors shall
accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of
this subsection, but if a majority of the voters casting
votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by
this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain
in effect.
85.1155. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, an additional tax of not to exceed
three cents per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation
may be levied and collected by any city, town, village,
county, or police protection district, or a central police
and emergency services board established in subsection 4 of
this section. All the funds derived from such tax,
including any existing surplus funds, shall be used for the
purpose of establishing and providing a joint central police
and emergency dispatching service and for expenditures for
equipment and services, except for salaries, wages, and
benefits, by cities, towns, villages, counties, or police
protection districts which contract with such joint central
police and emergency dispatching service.
2. The additional tax prescribed by this section shall
be levied only when the governing body of the city, town,

SB 1512 26
village, county, police protection district, or central
police and emergency services board determines that a
central police and emergency dispatching center will meet
the minimum requirements set by section 85.1165, and, except
where a central police and emergency services board is
established in accordance with subsection 4 of this section,
when the governing body has entered into a contract with the
center for police and emergency dispatching services. The
funds from the tax shall be kept separate and apart from all
other funds of the city, town, village, county, police
protection district, or central police and emergency
services board and shall be paid out only on order of the
governing body. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this
section, all funds received by such center, and all
operations of such center shall be governed and controlled
by a board of directors consisting of one member from each
such agency using the joint central police and emergency
dispatching service. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 4 of this section, in any county, city, town, or
village, where a tax-supported police protection district is
provided emergency dispatching services by any form of joint
communication organization or emergency dispatching center,
receiving directly or indirectly any funds so levied and
collected as provided in this section including any funds or
tariffs paid by telephone subscribers for 911 emergency
service, such joint communication organization, however
organized, shall be governed by a board of directors, and
the board of directors shall consist in part of one member
appointed by each county, city, town, village, or tax-
supported police protection district so served. Each member
shall be an elected official of a police protection
district, ambulance district, or city council appointed by

SB 1512 27
each such agency to serve for a one-year term or until a
successor is duly appointed.
3. In addition to the tax prescribed by subsections 1
and 2 of this section, an additional tax of not to exceed
two cents per one hundred dollars of assessed valuation
which has been approved by the voters may be levied and
collected by any city, town, village, county, or police
protection district, or a central police and emergency
services board established in subsection 4 of this section
of a county of the first classification with a charter form
of government which has a population between two hundred
thousand and five hundred thousand inhabitants, but all of
the funds derived from such tax shall be used solely for the
purpose of establishing and providing a joint central police
and emergency dispatching service.
85.1160. 1. Any police protection district which has
revised or reduced any levy which it has been authorized to
impose under the provisions of section 85.1145, 85.1150,
85.1155, or 85.1350, under any provision of the constitution
or laws of this state, may increase each such revised or
reduced levy up to, but not in excess of, the maximum limits
allowed under the section authorizing the rate of levy
sought to be increased by submitting the following
proposition to the voters of the district at any primary,
general, or special election:
Shall the board of directors of the ______ Police
Protection District be authorized to increase the
rate of levy for (insert purpose of which tax is
levied) from ______ cents to ______ cents on each
one hundred dollars of assessed valuation?
□ YES □ NO

SB 1512 28
2. If any of the propositions submitted under
subsection 1 of this section is approved by a majority of
the voters of the district voting thereon, the board of
directors may increase the levy which was the subject of
such proposition to the amount authorized by such
proposition.
85.1165. 1. No central police and emergency
dispatching center shall qualify to receive any funds
collected pursuant to section 85.1155 and this section
unless it meets or will meet, upon the acquisition or
retention of equipment, real and personal property, and
personnel, at least the following minimum equipment and
personnel requirements:
(1) Two separate transmitters and receivers capable of
operating on all working police and emergency radio
frequencies included in the area to be covered, together
with monitor receivers for police frequencies, point-to-
point police or local police dispatchers operating on a
twenty-four-hour basis, plus an emergency power source
capable of operating all equipment and lights necessary for
dispatching for an indefinite period of time;
(2) Duo-multichannel recording equipment for all radio
frequencies and telephone trunk "hot lines", complete with
automatic transfer on failure of logging recorder and
automatic time inserted on recorder and with instant
playback on any channel at the dispatcher's position without
interruption of regular log recorder;
(3) A minimum of three trunk telephone lines
designated as "hot lines" in reserve for "police or
emergency" calls only, plus such other lines as may be
necessary to conduct the normal business of the center,
which may also be used for police or emergency purposes;

SB 1512 29
(4) A chief dispatcher to be in charge of operations,
who shall be directly responsible to the management of the
dispatching service;
(5) Sufficient senior dispatchers to provide twenty-
four-hour attendance at the center;
(6) Such assistant dispatchers as may be necessary to
provide two-person switchboard operation during certain
hours as prescribed in section 85.1155 and this section;
(7) Alarms to police stations from the dispatching
center shall be two of the following type systems: wired or
by telephone line; radio or by tone signaling; or microwave
radio; or such other communications systems as may be
developed in the future which provide reliable and accurate
communications and which are not experimental in nature, so
that upon failure of either, the other will operate
independently, and both shall be capable of sounding alarm
at any agency facility using the joint central police and
emergency dispatching service;
(8) Radio alarm equipment at each agency facility
using the joint central police and emergency dispatching
service capable of operating without local utility power for
a period of at least eight hours and paging equipment for
police and emergency personnel; and
(9) Radio equipment, both mobile and portable, on all
police and emergency vehicles which answer alarms which will
provide two-way voice communication between the equipment
and the dispatching center.
2. A minimum of two dispatchers shall be on duty at
all times in any central dispatching center between the
hours of 7:00 a.m. and 11:00 p.m. If only one dispatcher is
on duty at other times, a twenty-minute watchman's check
shall be maintained.

SB 1512 30
3. All dispatchers shall be at least eighteen years of
age. Each dispatcher shall be capable of operating all
equipment used in the dispatching center.
4. Each dispatching center shall employ sufficient
personnel to ensure that no person will be required to be on
duty without at least twelve hours between shifts.
5. A central police and emergency dispatching center
meeting the requirements of this section shall qualify to
receive any funds collected pursuant to section 85.1155 and
this section and to use such funds for the acquisition, use
and maintenance of any property, both real and personal, and
for such other uses or purposes as may be determined by the
body governing the operations of the central police and
emergency dispatching center, and which are necessary or
advisable for the establishment, maintenance, or operation
of the central police and emergency dispatch center.
85.1170. On or before the applicable date required
under section 67.110 of each year, the board shall certify
to the county commission of each county within which the
district is located a rate of levy so fixed by the board as
provided by law, with directions that at the time and in the
manner required by law for levy of taxes for county purposes
such county commissions shall levy a tax at the rate so
fixed and determined upon the assessed valuation of all the
taxable tangible property within the district, in addition
to such other taxes as may be levied by such county
commissions.
85.1175. The board in certifying annual levies as
herein provided shall take into account, in addition to the
amounts necessary for general purposes as herein provided,
the maturing indebtedness for the ensuing year as provided
in its bonds and the interest on bonds, and deficiencies and

SB 1512 31
defaults of prior years and any contractual obligation and
shall make ample provision for the payment thereof. In case
the moneys produced from such levies, together with other
revenues of the district are not sufficient to pay
punctually the annual installments on its bonds and the
interest thereon, and to pay any defaults and deficiencies
on any such bonds or contracts duly approved by the voters
of the district, then the board shall provide for such
additional levying of taxes as may be necessary to pay for
all such, and notwithstanding any limitations, such taxes
shall be continued to be levied until the indebtedness of
the district shall be fully and currently paid.
85.1180. 1. The body having authority to levy taxes
within each county in which all or part of a district lies
shall levy the taxes provided in sections 85.1000 to
85.1400, and all officials charged with the duty of
collecting taxes in each such county shall collect such
taxes at the time and in the manner and with like interest
and penalties as other taxes are collected. When collected,
such taxes shall be paid to the district ordering the levy
and collection, or entitled to the same, and the payment of
such collections shall be made monthly to the treasurer of
the district and paid into the depositary thereof to the
credit of the district. All funds received by the district
shall be deposited in a depositary and secured in the manner
provided by law for the deposit of county funds.
2. All taxes levied under the provisions of sections
85.1000 to 85.1400, together with interest thereon and
penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of
collecting the same, shall, until paid, constitute a lien on
and against the property taxed, and such lien shall be on a
parity with the tax lien of general taxes, and no sale of

SB 1512 32
such property to enforce any general tax or other lien shall
extinguish the lien of district taxes.
85.1185. If the taxes levied are not paid as herein
provided, then the delinquent real property shall be sold at
the regular tax sale for the payment of said taxes, interest
and penalties, in the manner provided by the statutes of the
state of Missouri for selling property for the nonpayment of
general taxes. If there are no bids at said tax sale for
the property so offered, said property shall be struck off
to the county or other agency provided by law, and the
county or agency shall account to the district in the same
manner as provided by law for accounting for school, town,
and city taxes. Delinquent personal property shall be
distrained and sold as provided by general law.
85.1190. Whenever any bonded or contractual
indebtedness has been incurred by a district, it shall be
lawful for the board to levy taxes and collect revenue for
the purpose of creating a reserve fund in such amount as the
board may determine, to be used to meet the obligations of
the district.
85.1195. 1. The boundaries of any district organized
pursuant to the provisions of sections 85.1000 to 85.1400
may be changed in the manner prescribed in this section; but
any change of boundaries of the district shall not impair or
affect its organization or its rights in or to property, or
any of its rights or privileges whatsoever; nor shall it
affect or impair or discharge any contract, obligation,
lien, or charge for or upon which it might be liable or
chargeable had any change of boundaries not been made.
2. The boundaries may be changed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five percent of the number of voters who
voted in the most recent gubernatorial election in the area

SB 1512 33
to be annexed may file with the board a petition in writing
praying that such real property be included within the
district; provided that in the case of a municipality having
less than twenty percent of its total population in one
police protection district, the entire remaining portion may
be included in another district so that none of the city is
outside of a police protection district at the time. The
petition shall describe the property to be included in the
district and shall describe the property owned by the
petitioners and shall be deemed to give assent of the
petitioners to the inclusion in the district of the property
described in the petition; and such petition shall be in
substantially the form set forth in section 85.1290 dealing
with referendums and verified in like manner; provided,
however, that in the event that there are more than twenty-
five property owners or taxpaying electors signing the
petition, it shall be deemed sufficient description of their
property in the petition as required in this section to list
the addresses of such property; or
(2) All of the owners of any territory or tract of
land near or adjacent to a police protection district who
own all of the real estate in such territory or tract of
land may file a petition with the board praying that such
real property be included in the district. The petition
shall describe the property owned by the petitioners and
shall be deemed to give assent of the petitioners to the
inclusion in the district of the property described in the
petition.
3. The secretary of the board shall cause notice of
the filing of any petition filed pursuant to this section to
be given and published in the county in which the property
is located, which notice shall recite the filing of such

SB 1512 34
petition, the number of petitioners, a general description
of the boundaries of the area proposed to be included, and
the prayer of the petitioners; giving notice to all persons
interested to appear at the office of the board at the time
named in the notice and show cause in writing, if any they
have, why the petition should not be granted. The board
shall at the time and place mentioned, or at such time or
times to which the hearing may be adjourned, proceed to hear
the petition and all objections thereto presented in writing
by any person showing cause why the petition should not be
granted. The failure of any person interested to show cause
in writing why such petition shall not be granted shall be
deemed as an assent on his or her part to the inclusion of
such lands in the district as prayed for in the petition.
4. If the board deems it for the best interest of the
district, it shall grant the petition, but if the board
determines that some portion of the property mentioned in
the petition cannot as a practical matter be served by the
district, or if it deems it for the best interest of the
district that some portion of the property in the petition
not be included in the district, then the board shall grant
the petition in part only. If the petition is granted, the
board shall make an order to that effect and file the same
with the county clerk; and upon the order of the county
having jurisdiction over the district, the property shall be
included in the district. If the petition contains the
signatures of all the owners of the property pursuant to the
provisions of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this
section, the property shall be included in the district upon
the order of the county. If the petition contains the
signatures of twenty-five percent of the number of voters
who voted in the most recent gubernatorial election in the

SB 1512 35
area to be annexed pursuant to subdivision (1) or
subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section, the
property shall be included in the district subject to the
election provided in section 85.1200. The county having
jurisdiction over the district shall proceed to make any
such order including such additional property within the
district as is provided in the order of the board, unless
the county clerk shall find that such order of the board was
not authorized by law or that such order of the board was
not supported by competent and substantial evidence.
5. Any person aggrieved by any decision of the board
made pursuant to the provisions of this section may appeal
that decision to a court of competent jurisdiction of the
county in which the property is located within thirty days
of the decision by the board.
6. No police protection district, or employee thereof,
in which territory is annexed pursuant to this section shall
be required to comply with any prescribed law enforcement
officer training program or regimen which would not
otherwise apply to the district or its employees, but for
the requirements applicable to the annexed territory.
85.1200. 1. If the petition to add any territory or
tract of land to the district contained fewer than all of
the signatures required pursuant to subdivision (2) of
subsection 2 of section 85.1195, the decree of extension of
boundaries shall not become final and conclusive until it
has been submitted to an election of the voters residing
within the boundaries described in such decree and until it
has been assented to by a majority vote of the voters in the
newly included area voting on the question. The decree
shall also provide for the holding of the election to vote

SB 1512 36
on the proposition of extending the boundaries of the
district, and shall fix the date for holding the election.
2. The question shall be submitted in substantially
the following form:
Shall the boundaries of the ______ Police Protection
District be extended to include the following
described property? (Describe property.)
□ YES □ NO
3. If a majority of the voters voting on the
proposition vote in favor of the extension of the boundaries
of the district, then the county clerk shall enter its
further order declaring the decree of extension of the
boundaries to be final and conclusive. In the event,
however, that the county clerk finds that a majority of the
voters voting thereon voted against the proposition to
extend the boundaries of the district, then the county shall
enter its further order declaring the decree of extension of
boundaries to be void and of no effect.
85.1205. Within thirty days after the final order of
the county extending the boundaries of the district, the
county clerk of that county shall transmit to the county
clerk and to the recorder of deeds in each county in which
the district is located copies of the findings and decrees
of the county extending the boundaries of the district. The
same shall be filed in the same manner as articles of
incorporation are required to be filed under the general
laws concerning corporations, and each recorder and clerk
shall receive a fee of one dollar for filing and preserving
the same.

SB 1512 37
85.1210. The boundaries of a police protection
district shall be coterminous with and include the whole of
any cities, towns, or villages included within the police
protection district. Upon the voters adopting a police
protection district, any municipal police department
contained within said district shall be dissolved, merged
with, and absorbed by the police protection district.
85.1215. All real property included within, or
excluded from, a district shall thereafter be subject to the
levy of taxes for the payment of any indebtedness of the
district outstanding at the time of inclusion or exclusion;
provided, however, that after any real property shall have
been excluded from a district, as herein provided, any
buildings and improvements thereafter erected or constructed
on said excluded real property, and all machinery and
equipment thereafter installed or placed therein or thereon,
and all tangible personal property not in said district at
the time of the exclusion of said real property from said
district which shall thereafter be situated on or used in
connection with said real property, shall not be subject to
any taxes levied by said district.
85.1220. To carry out the purposes of sections 85.1000
to 85.1400, the board is hereby authorized to issue
negotiable coupon bonds of the district as herein provided.
Bonds shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding six
percent per annum, payable semiannually, and shall be due
and payable serially, either annually or semiannually,
commencing not later than three years and extending not more
than twenty years from their date. The form and terms of
said bonds, including provisions for their payment and
redemption, shall be determined by the board. If the board
so determines, such bonds may be redeemable prior to

SB 1512 38
maturity upon payment of a premium, not exceeding three
percent of the principal thereof. Said bonds shall be
executed in the name of and on behalf of the district and
signed by the chairman of the board, with the seal of the
district affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of
the board. Said bonds shall be in such denominations as the
board shall determine and the bonds and coupons thereto
attached shall be payable to bearer. Interest coupons shall
bear the original or facsimile signature of the chairman of
the board.
85.1225. Whenever any board shall, by resolution,
determine that the interest of said district and the public
interest or necessity demand the acquisition, construction,
installation, or completion of any works or other
improvements or facilities, or the making of any contract
with the United States or other persons or corporations, to
carry out the objects or purposes of said district,
requiring the creation of an indebtedness in an amount
exceeding in any year the income and revenue provided for
such year plus any unencumbered balances from previous
years, said board shall order the submission of the
proposition of issuing such obligations or bonds, or
creating other indebtedness, to the voters of the election.
The declaration of public interest or necessity herein
required and the provision for holding of such election may
be included within one and the same resolution, which
resolution, in addition to such declaration of public
interest or necessity, shall recite the objects and purposes
for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the
estimated cost of the works or improvements, as the case may
be, the amount of principal of the indebtedness to be
incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be

SB 1512 39
paid on such indebtedness. Such resolution shall also fix
the date upon which such election shall be held.
85.1230. 1. The question shall be submitted in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ Police Protection District (here state
the proposition to be submitted)?
2. The proposition so submitted, if relating to bonds,
shall set out the amount of the issue and the purpose.
85.1235. At any regular or special meeting of the
board held within five days following the date of such
election, the board shall declare the results.
85.1240. In the event that it shall appear from the
returns that the constitutionally required percentage of the
voters of the district who shall have voted on any such
proposition submitted hereunder at such election voted in
favor of such proposition, the district shall thereupon be
authorized to incur such indebtedness or obligations, enter
into such contract or issue, and sell such bonds of the
district, as the case may be, all for the purpose or
purposes and object or objects provided for in the
proposition or propositions submitted hereunder and in the
resolution therefor, and in the amount so provided and at a
rate of interest not exceeding the rate of interest recited
in such resolution. Submission of the proposition of
incurring such obligation or bonded or other indebtedness at
such an election shall not prevent or prohibit submission of
the same or other propositions at a subsequent election.
85.1245. Whenever a petition signed by not less than
twenty-five percent of the voters who cast votes at the last
election for the district director in any district organized

SB 1512 40
under the provisions of sections 85.1000 to 85.1400 is filed
with the county having jurisdiction over the district,
setting forth all the relevant facts pertaining to the
district, and alleging that the further operation of the
district is inimicable to the best interests of the
inhabitants of the district, and that the district should,
in the interest of the public welfare and safety, be
dissolved, the county shall have authority, after hearing
evidence submitted on the aforesaid question, to order a
submission of the question, after having caused publication
of notice of a hearing on said petition, in substantially
the following form:
Shall ______ Police Protection District be
dissolved?
85.1250. If the county clerk shall find that a
sufficient number of signatures have been gathered, it shall
make an order reciting the same and providing for the
submission of the proposition to dissolve such district to a
vote of the voters of the district, setting forth such
further details in its order as may be necessary to an
orderly conduct of such election. Such election shall be
held at the municipal election. Returns of said election
shall be certified to the county. If the county clerk finds
that two-thirds of the voters voting thereon shall have
voted in favor of the proposition to dissolve said district,
the county shall make a final order dissolving said
district, and the decree shall contain a proviso that said
district shall continue in full force for the purpose of
paying all outstanding and lawful obligations and disposing
of property of the district; but no additional costs or

SB 1512 41
obligations shall be created except such as are necessary to
pay such costs, obligations, and liabilities theretofore
incurred, or necessary to the winding up of the district.
If the county clerk shall find that two-thirds of the voters
of the district voting thereon shall not have voted
favorably on the proposition to dissolve such district, then
the county shall make a final order declaring such result
dismissing the petition praying for the dissolution of said
district; and the said district shall continue to operate in
the same manner as though said petition asking for such
dissolution has not been filed.
85.1255. The dissolution of a police protection
district shall not invalidate or affect any right accruing
to such police district, or to any person, or invalidate or
affect any contract or indebtedness entered into or imposed
upon such police protection district or person; and whenever
the county clerk shall, under the provisions of section
85.1250, dissolve a police protection district, the said
county clerk shall appoint some competent person to act as
trustee for the police protection district so dissolved and
such trustee before entering upon the discharge of his or
her duties shall take and subscribe an oath that he or she
will faithfully discharge the duties of his or her office,
and shall give bond with sufficient security, to be approved
by the county clerk to the use of such dissolved police
protection district, for the faithful discharge of his or
her duties, and shall proceed to liquidate the district
under orders of the county clerk, including the levying of
any taxes provided for in sections 85.1000 to 85.1400.
85.1260. Any and all taxable tangible property located
within any such district shall continue to be subject to the
levy of taxes for general purposes and for the payment of

SB 1512 42
any indebtedness previously created, all as provided
herein. The repeal of any acts herein shall not be held to
affect or invalidate any claims, demands, acts, debts,
contracts, obligations, or indebtedness of any district
created under the provisions of any such act.
85.1265. In any and every case where a notice is
provided for in sections 85.1000 to 85.1400, if the county
clerk finds for any reason that due notice was not given,
the county clerk shall not thereby lose jurisdiction, and
the proceeding in question shall not thereby be void or be
abated, but the county clerk shall in that case order due
notice to be given, and shall continue the hearing until
such time as notice shall be properly given, and thereupon
shall proceed as though notice had been properly given in
the first instance.
85.1270. 1. Two or more police protection districts
may consolidate with each other in the manner hereinafter
provided, and only if the districts have one or more common
boundaries, in whole or in part, or are located within the
same county, in whole or in part, as to any respective two
of the districts which are so consolidating.
2. By a majority vote of each board of directors of
each police protection district included within the proposed
consolidation, a consolidation plan may be adopted. The
consolidation plan shall include the name of the proposed
consolidated district, the legal description of the
boundaries of each district to be consolidated, and a legal
description of the boundaries of the consolidated district,
the amount of outstanding bonds, if any, of each district
proposed to be consolidated, a listing of the police
stations within each district, and the names of the
districts to be consolidated.

SB 1512 43
3. The petition shall set forth:
(1) The name of the proposed district consisting of a
chosen name preceding the words "police protection district";
(2) An estimate of the number of inhabitants and of
the assessed valuation of the taxable tangible property of
the district, and of the yield from the intangible personal
property located in the district;
(3) The estimated cost of the proposed improvements;
(4) A general description of the boundaries of the
district or the territory to be included therein, and the
boundaries of three wards in which the district shall be
subdivided, with such certainty as to enable a property
owner to determine whether or not his property is within the
district, and a plat of the proposed district;
(5) The wards shall be compact and contiguous and
contain equal populations as nearly as possible, and shall
be reapportioned, by the board of directors, within one
hundred eighty days after each decennial census is reported
to the president of the United States;
(6) Such other data and information as may be useful
to the voters in determining the necessity for the
organization of the district;
(7) A prayer for the organization of the district.
4. The decree of incorporation shall not become final
and conclusive until it has been submitted to an election of
the voters residing within the boundaries described in such
decree, and until it has been assented to by a majority vote
of the voters of the district voting on the question. The
decree shall also provide for the holding of the election to
vote on the proposition of incorporating the district, and
to elect three persons to act as the elected members of the
first board of directors, and shall fix the date for holding

SB 1512 44
the election on the first general municipal election date to
vote on a tax pursuant to section 85.1150 following entry of
the decree in which notice of election may be issued
sufficiently in advance of the election according to law.
5. The question shall be submitted in substantially
the following form:
Shall there be incorporated a police protection
district?
□ YES □ NO
6. The proposition of electing the first board of
directors or the election of subsequent directors may be
submitted on a separate ballot or on the same ballot which
contains any other proposition of the police protection
district. The ballot to be used for the election of a
director or directors shall be substantially in the
following form:
OFFICIAL BALLOT
Instruction to voters:
Place a cross (X) mark in the square opposite the
name of the candidate or candidates you favor.
(Here state the number of directors to be elected
and their term of office.)
ELECTION
(Here insert name of district) Police Protection
District
(Here insert date of election)
FOR BOARD OF DIRECTORS

SB 1512 45
WARD (#)
□ ____________ (Name of candidate)
□ ____________ (Name of candidate)
□ ____________ (Name of candidate)
7. If a majority of the voters voting on the
proposition or propositions voted in favor of the
proposition to incorporate the district, then the county
clerk shall enter its further order declaring the decree of
incorporation to be final and conclusive. In the event,
however, that the county clerk finds that a majority of the
voters voting thereon voted against the proposition to
incorporate the district, then the county clerk shall enter
its further order declaring the decree of incorporation to
be void and of no effect. If the county clerk enters an
order declaring the decree of incorporation to be final and
conclusive, it shall at the same time designate the first
board of directors of the district who have been elected by
the voters voting thereon. The person elected from ward 1
shall hold office for a term of one year, the person elected
from ward 2 shall hold office for a term of two years, and
the person elected from ward 3 shall hold office for a term
of three years from the date of the election of the first
board of directors and until their successors are duly
100 elected and qualified. Thereafter, the elected members of
101 the board shall be elected to serve terms of three years and
102 until their successors are duly elected and qualified. The
103 county clerk shall at the same time enter an order of record
104 declaring the result of the election on the proposition, if
105 any, to incur bonded indebtedness.

SB 1512 46
106 8. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 1 to
107 4 of this section to the contrary, the mayor of each
108 municipality and chairperson of each village included within
109 the police protection district shall be an ex-officio member
110 of the board of directors so long as he or she shall hold
111 the office of mayor or chairperson, with all of the same
112 rights, privileges, and duties as an elected director.
113 9. Each board of the districts approving the plan for
114 proposed consolidation shall duly certify and file in the
115 office of the county clerk in which the district is located
116 a copy of the plan of consolidation, bearing the signatures
117 of those directors who vote in favor thereof, together with
118 a petition for consolidation. The petition may be made
119 jointly by all of the districts within the respective plan
120 of consolidation. A filing fee of fifty dollars shall be
121 deposited with the clerk, on the filing of the petition,
122 against the costs of the county clerk.
123 10. The county clerk sitting in and for any county to
124 which the petition is presented is hereby vested with
125 jurisdiction, power, and authority to hear the same, and to
126 approve the consolidation and order such districts
127 consolidated, after holding an election, as hereinafter
128 provided.
129 11. If the county clerk finds the plan for
130 consolidation to have been duly approved by the respective
131 boards of directors of the police protection districts
132 proposed to be consolidated, then the county clerk shall
133 enter its order of record directing the submission of the
134 question.
135 12. The order shall direct publication of notice of
136 election, and shall fix the date thereof. The order shall
137 direct that the elections shall be held to vote on the

SB 1512 47
138 proposition of consolidating the districts and to elect
139 three persons, having the qualifications declared in section
140 85.1065 and being among the then directors of the districts
141 proposed to be consolidated, to become directors of the
142 consolidated district.
143 13. The question shall be submitted in substantially
144 the following form:
145 Shall the ______ Police Protection District and
146 the ______ Police Protection District be
147 consolidated into one police protection district
148 to be known as the ______ Police Protection
149 District, with tax levies not in excess of the
150 following amounts: maintenance fund ______
151 cents per one hundred dollars assessed
152 valuation; ambulance service ______ cents per
153 one hundred dollars assessed valuation; pension
154 fund ______ cents per one hundred dollars
155 assessed valuation; and dispatching fund ______
156 cents per one hundred dollars assessed
157 valuation?
158 14. If, upon the canvass and declaration, it is found
159 and determined that a majority of the voters of the
160 districts voting on the proposition or propositions have
161 voted in favor of the proposition to incorporate the
162 consolidated district, the county shall then further, in its
163 order, designate the first board of directors of the
164 consolidated district, who have been elected by the voters
165 voting thereon, the one receiving the third highest number
166 of votes to hold office until the first Tuesday in April
167 which is more than one year after the date of election, the
168 one receiving the second highest number of votes to hold
169 office until two years after the first Tuesday aforesaid,
170 and the one receiving the highest number of votes until four

SB 1512 48
171 years after the first Tuesday in April as aforesaid. If any
172 other propositions are also submitted at the election, the
173 county clerk, in its order, shall also declare the results
174 of the votes thereon. If the county clerk shall find and
175 determine, upon the canvass and declaration, that a majority
176 of the voters of the consolidated district have not voted in
177 favor of the proposition to incorporate the consolidated
178 district, then the county shall enter its order declaring
179 the proceedings void and of no effect, and shall dismiss the
180 same at the cost of petitioners.
85.1275. If the vote prescribed by section 85.1270 is
in favor of the consolidation, then, upon the order of the
county clerk declaring the same, the consolidated district
thereupon shall be a political subdivision of the state of
Missouri and a body corporate, with all the powers of like
or similar corporations, and with all the powers of police
protection districts under section 85.1120, whose affairs
shall be conducted as provided in sections 85.1000 to
85.1400, with all the powers, privileges, and duties therein
conferred and provided upon police protection districts in
the county. All properties, rights, assets, and liabilities
of the several police protection districts which are so
consolidated, including outstanding bonds thereof if any,
shall become forthwith and without any further procedure the
properties, rights, assets, and liabilities of the
consolidated police protection district. The provisions of
section 85.1010 shall also apply to the election and order
establishing the consolidated police protection district.
85.1280. The order of the county clerk having
jurisdiction, as well as finding and determining the votes
of the election, shall direct the county clerk to transmit
to the recorder of deeds of each county in which the

SB 1512 49
consolidated district is located a certified copy of such
order, to be filed in the same manner as articles of
incorporation are required to be filed under the general
laws concerning corporations, and each recorder and each
clerk shall each receive, for such filing, a fee of one
dollar, to be charged as costs in the proceeding.
85.1285. All powers which may be exercised by the
board of directors of a police protection district may be
exercised by the voters of that district by initiative or
referendum.
85.1290. 1. A petition for a referendum shall be in
substantially the following form:
WARNING
It is a felony for anyone to sign any
initiative or referendum petition with any
name other than his or her own, or to
knowingly sign his or her name more than once
for the measure, or to sign such petition when
he or she is not a legal voter.
INITIATIVE PETITION
To the board of directors of the ______ Police
Protection District:
We the undersigned, citizens and voters of the
state of Missouri and the ______ Police
Protection District, respectfully order that
(describe the measure) shall be referred to
the people of the district for their approval
or rejection, at the regular (special)
election to be held on the ______ day of
______, 20______, and each for himself says: I
have personally signed this petition; I am a
duly qualified elector of the state and

SB 1512 50
district; my residence and post office address
are correctly written after my name.
Name ______ Residence ______
Post Office ______
(if in a city, street and number)
(Here follow numbered lines for signatures.)
2. Every sheet for petitioners' signatures shall be
attached to a full and correct copy of the title and text of
the measure proposed by the initiative petition. Referendum
petitions shall be attached to a full and correct copy of
the measure on which the referendum is demanded.
3. Each sheet of every petition containing signatures
shall be verified in substantially the following form by the
person who circulated the sheet, by his or her affidavit
thereon:
State of Missouri
County of ______
I, ______, being first duly sworn, say that
each person whose name appears on this sheet
signed his or her name thereto in my presence;
I believe that each has stated his or her
name, post office address and residence
correctly, and that each signer is a voter of
the state of Missouri and ______ Police
Protection District.
(Signature and post office address of affiant)
Subscribed and sworn to before me this ______
day of ______, 20______

SB 1512 51
(Signature and title of officer before whom
oath is made and his or her post office
address)
85.1300. 1. If an initiative or referendum petition
is presented to the secretary of the board of directors,
which petition carries the names of voters of the district,
equal to twenty percent of the number of votes of members of
the district who voted in the last regular district
election, the board of directors shall submit the question
pursuant to the order or demand of the petition.
2. The measure called for in the petition is adopted
if it receives an affirmative majority vote of the voters
voting at the district election.
85.1305. In addition to the compensation provided
pursuant to section 85.1105 for police protection districts
located in any county with a charter form of government,
each member of any such police protection district board may
receive an attendance fee not to exceed one hundred dollars
for attending a board meeting conducted pursuant to chapter
610, but such board member shall not be paid for attending
more than four such meetings in any calendar month.
However, no board member shall be paid more than one
attendance fee if such member attends more than one meeting
conducted under chapter 610 in a calendar week.
85.1310. 1. In addition to all other limits set forth
in sections 85.1000 to 85.1400, the board in counties of the
first classification shall in each year determine the amount
of money necessary to be raised by taxation, and shall fix a
rate of levy which, when levied upon every dollar of the
taxable tangible property within the district as shown by
the last completed assessment, and with other revenues, will

SB 1512 52
raise the amount required by the district annually to supply
funds for paying the expenses of organization and operation
and the costs of acquiring, supplying, and maintaining the
property, works, and equipment of the district, and maintain
the necessary personnel, which rate of levy shall not exceed
forty cents on the one hundred dollars valuation. The board
in any county of the first classification having a
population in excess of nine hundred thousand may fix an
additional rate not to exceed twenty-five cents on the
hundred dollars valuation and the board in all other first
classification counties may fix an additional rate, not to
exceed fifteen cents on the hundred dollars valuation, the
revenues from which shall be deposited in a special fund and
used only for the pension program of the district, by
submitting the following question to the voters at the
municipal general, primary, or general election in such
district or at any election at which a member of the board
of directors is to be elected:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Police
Protection District be authorized to levy an annual
tax rate of ______ cents per one hundred dollars
valuation, the revenues from which shall be
deposited in a special fund and used only for the
pension program of the district?

In addition thereto, to fix a rate of levy which will enable
it to promptly pay in full when due all interest on and
principal of bonds and other obligations of the district,
and to pay any indebtedness authorized by a vote of the
people as provided by sections 85.1000 to 85.1265; and in
the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies in the bonded

SB 1512 53
or contractual indebtedness, an additional levy may be made
as provided in section 85.1175.
2. Any district approving a tax levy rate pursuant to
the provisions of subsection 1 of this section shall
transfer all revenue collected plus interest monthly for
deposit in the district retirement fund. The board of
directors for the police protection district shall comply
with the prudent investor standard for investment
fiduciaries as provided in section 105.688 when investing
the assets of the pension program.
3. Any district may impose a tax not to exceed ten
cents on the one hundred dollars valuation, in addition to
the rate which the board may levy pursuant to this section,
by submitting the following question to the voters at any
election in such district held on the first Tuesday in April
of any year:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Police
Protection District be authorized to increase the
annual tax rate from ______ cents to ______ cents
on the hundred dollars assessed valuation?

In addition thereto, to fix a rate of levy which will enable
it to promptly pay in full when due all interest on and
principal of bonds and other obligations of the district,
and to pay any indebtedness authorized by a vote of the
people as provided by sections 85.1000 to 85.1265; and in
the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies in the bonded
or contractual indebtedness, an additional levy may be made
as provided in section 85.1175.

SB 1512 54
85.1340. 1. Police protection districts, when asked
to respond to emergencies beyond their corporate boundaries,
may charge for those services rendered.
2. When formal mutual aid agreements are in place with
adjoining areas and departments, this provision is not
applicable except by formal agreement and contract with the
adjoining department.
3. In responding to police or other emergencies
outside the corporate boundaries of a police protection
district, the police protection district responding and its
police officers shall be subject to the same liabilities for
claims for death or injury to persons or property as those
subjected to when responding to police or emergencies within
their respective police protection district.
4. In responding to emergencies outside the corporate
boundaries of the police protection district, the police
protection district responding may charge up to the
following fees:
(1) One hundred dollars for responding to each police
call or alarm;
(2) Five hundred dollars for each hour or a
proportional sum for each quarter hour spent in combating a
crime or emergency.
5. No property owner shall be liable for fees or
charges under this section if the property owner has
previously entered into an agreement with the police
protection district in writing, prior to the occurrence of
the crime or emergency.
85.1355. 1. In counties having a charter form of
government and having more than one million inhabitants and
in counties of the first classification which contain a city
with a population of one hundred thousand or more

SB 1512 55
inhabitants which adjoins no other county of the first
classification, the governing body of each police protection
district shall cause an audit to be performed consistent
with rules and regulations promulgated by the state auditor.
2. (1) All such districts shall cause an audit to be
performed biennially. Each such audit shall cover the
period of the two previous fiscal years.
(2) Any police protection district with less than
fifty thousand dollars in annual revenues may, with the
approval of the state auditor, be exempted from the audit
requirement of this section if it files appropriate reports
on its affairs with the state auditor within five months
after the close of each fiscal year and if these reports
comply with the provisions of section 105.145. These
reports shall be reviewed, approved, and signed by a
majority of the members of the governing body of the police
protection district seeking exemption.
3. Copies of each audit report shall be completed and
submitted to the police protection district and the state
auditor within six months after the close of the audit
period. One copy of the audit report and accompanying
comments shall be maintained by the governing body of the
police protection district for public inspection at
reasonable times in the principal office of the district.
The state auditor shall also maintain a copy of the audit
report and comment. If any audit report fails to comply
with the rules promulgated by the state auditor, that
official shall notify the police protection district and
specify the defects. If the defects specified are not
corrected within ninety days from the date of the state
auditor's notice to the district, or if a copy of the
required audit report and accompanying comments have not

SB 1512 56
been received by the state auditor within six months after
the end of the audit period, the state auditor shall make,
or cause to be made, the required audit at the expense of
the police protection district.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
any police protection district based and substantially
located in a county of the third classification with a
population of at least thirty-one thousand five hundred but
not greater than thirty-three thousand.
85.1360. If a property tax has been approved and is
being collected for the purpose of supporting a police
protection district and such police protection district is
dissolved, such tax shall continue to be collected and the
proceeds of such tax shall be distributed to the governing
body of the city formerly containing the dissolved police
protection district, provided that the boundaries of the
police protection district encompass such city and the tax
is used only for providing police protection services within
such city.
85.1365. 1. Each member of a police protection
district board shall be subject to recall from office by the
registered voters of the district from which he or she was
elected. Proceedings may be commenced for the recall of any
police protection district board member by the filing of a
notice of intention to circulate a recall petition pursuant
to sections 85.1365 to 85.1395.
2. Proceedings may not be commenced against any member
if, at the time of commencement, that member:
(1) Has not held office during his or her current term
for a period of more than one hundred eighty days; or
(2) Has one hundred eighty days or less remaining in
his or her term; or

SB 1512 57
(3) Has had a recall election determined in his or her
favor within the current term of office.
85.1370. 1. The notice of intention to circulate a
recall petition shall be served personally, or by certified
mail, on the board member sought to be recalled. A copy
thereof shall be filed, along with an affidavit of the time
and manner of service, with the election authority, as
defined in chapter 115. A separate notice shall be filed
for each board member sought to be recalled and shall
contain all of the following:
(1) The name of the board member sought to be recalled;
(2) A statement, not exceeding two hundred words in
length, of the reasons for the proposed recall;
(3) The name or names and business or residence
address or addresses of at least one, and not more than
five, proponent or proponents of the recall.
2. Within seven days after the filing of the notice of
intention, the board member may file with the election
authority a statement, not exceeding two hundred words in
length, in answer to the statement of the proponents. If an
answer is filed, the board member shall also serve a copy of
it, personally or by certified mail, on one of the
proponents named in the notice of intention.
3. The statement and answer are intended solely for
the information of the voters. No insufficiency in form or
substance thereof shall affect the validity of the election
proceedings.
85.1375. Before any signature may be affixed to a
recall petition, the petition shall bear all of the
following:
(1) A request that an election be called to elect a
successor to the board member;

SB 1512 58
(2) A copy of the notice of intention, including the
statement of grounds for recall;
(3) The answer of the board member sought to be
recalled, if any. If the board member has not answered, the
petition shall so state;
(4) A place for each signer to affix his or her
signature, printed name, and residence address including
city or unincorporated community.
85.1380. Each section of the petition, when submitted
to the election authority, shall have attached to it an
affidavit signed by the circulator of that section, setting
forth all of the following:
(1) The printed name of the affiant;
(2) The residence address of the affiant;
(3) That the affiant circulated that section and saw
the appended signatures be written;
(4) That according to the best information and belief
of the affiant, each signature is the genuine signature of
the person whose name it purports to be;
(5) That the affiant is a registered voter of the
police protection district of the board member sought to be
recalled; and
(6) The dates between which all the signatures to the
petition were obtained.
85.1385. 1. A recall petition shall be filed with the
election authority not more than one hundred eighty days
after the filing of the notice of intention.
2. The number of qualified signatures required in
order to recall an officer shall be equal in number to at
least twenty-five percent of the number of voters who voted
in the most recent gubernatorial election in that district.

SB 1512 59
3. Within twenty days from the filing of the recall
petition, the election authority shall determine whether or
not the petition was signed by the required number of
qualified signatures. The election authority shall file
with the petition a certificate showing the results of the
examination. The authority shall give the proponents a copy
of the certificate upon their request.
4. If the election authority certifies the petition to
be insufficient, it may be supplemented within ten days of
the date of certificate by filing additional petition
sections containing all of the information required by
section 85.1380 and this section. Within ten days after the
supplemental copies are filed, the election authority shall
file with it a certificate stating whether or not the
petition as supplemented is sufficient.
5. If the certificate shows that the petition as
supplemented is insufficient, no action shall be taken on
it; however, the petition shall remain on file.
85.1390. 1. If the election authority finds the
signatures on the petition, together with the supplementary
petition sections if any, to be sufficient, it shall submit
its certificate as to the sufficiency of the petition to the
police protection district board prior to its next meeting.
The certificate shall contain:
(1) The name of the member whose recall is sought;
(2) The number of signatures required by law;
(3) The total number of signatures on the petition;
(4) The number of valid signatures on the petition.
2. Following the police protection board's receipt of
the certificate, the county election authority shall order
an election to be held on one of the election days specified
in section 115.123. The election shall be held not less

SB 1512 60
than forty-five days nor more than one hundred twenty days
after the police protection district board receives the
petition. Nominations hereunder shall be made by filing a
statement of candidacy with the election authority.
3. At any time prior to forty-two days before the
election, the member sought to be recalled may offer his or
her resignation. If his or her resignation is offered, the
recall question shall be removed from the ballot and the
office declared vacant. The member who resigned may not
fill the vacancy which shall be filled as provided by law.
85.1395. The provisions of chapter 115 governing the
conduct of elections shall apply, where appropriate, to
recall elections held under sections 85.1365 to 85.1395.
The costs of the election shall be paid as provided in
chapter 115.
85.1400. Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, any board of directors established under the
provisions of sections 85.1000 to 85.1400 administering its
own retirement or other benefits-related plan shall
administer such plan by a separate five-member pension board
of trustees. Pension plan participants shall elect three
such participants to be submitted to the board of
directors. The board of directors shall select two of the
three participants to serve on the five-member pension board
of trustees. The board of directors shall be the other
three members of the five-member pension board of trustees.
✓